North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-03 Powers, Management, and Operation of Banks

6-03-01.
Powers before receipt of certificate of authority.

No association may transact any business, except such as is incidental and necessarily preliminary to its organization, until it has been authorized by the secretary of state to commence the business of banking and has received a certificate of authorization, and such certificate has been returned by the commissioner with the commissioner’s certificate that the capital stock and required surplus have been paid in full, that federal deposit insurance corporation insurance of deposits has been secured, and that all conditions of the law have been strictly complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 4; 1893, ch. 27, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 3229, subs. 7; S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 1, subs. 7; R.C. 1899, § 3229, subs. 7; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 5; R.C. 1905, § 4639, subs. 7; S.L. 1913, ch. 51, § 1, subs. 7; C.L. 1913, § 5150, subs. 7; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 13, subs. g; R.C. 1943, § 6-0301; S.L. 1977, ch. 67, § 3.

Cross-References.

Proof of federal deposit insurance required before certificate of authority will be delivered, see § 6-02-03.

6-03-02.
Powers.

After an association has made and filed articles of association and an organization certificate, it becomes a body corporate, and as such, and in the name designated in the certificate, it, subject to section 6-03-01, has the power to:

Have a perpetual existence, unless it is sooner dissolved according to the provisions of this title, or unless its franchise becomes forfeited by a violation of law.

Make contracts.

Sue and be sued.

Elect or appoint directors, such board to consist of any number of members, not less than three nor more than twenty-five, at least two-thirds of whom must be citizens of the United States, and, by such board of directors, to appoint a president, who must be a member of said board, and such other employees as may be required, to define their duties, to require bonds of them and fix the penalty thereof, and to dismiss such officers and employees, or any of them, and appoint others to fill their places.

Provide, by its board of directors, bylaws not inconsistent with the laws of this state to regulate the manner in which its directors and officers must be elected or appointed. Vacancies in the board of directors, not exceeding one-third of the whole membership thereof in any calendar year, must be filled by a majority vote of the remaining members. The bylaws must provide a method for filling vacancies exceeding that number.

Provide, by its board of directors, bylaws not inconsistent with the laws of this state to regulate the manner in which its stock and property must be transferred, its business conducted, and the privileges granted to it by law exercised and enjoyed.

Exercise, as determined by the board by order or rule, all the incidental powers as are necessary to carry on the business of banking, including discounting and negotiating promissory notes, bills of exchange, drafts, and other evidences of debt; receiving deposits; buying and selling exchange, coin, and bullion; loaning money upon real or personal security, or both; soliciting and receiving deposits in the nature of custodial accounts for the purpose of health savings or similar health care cost funding accounts, retirement fund contracts, or pension programs, and such custodial accounts are exempt from chapter 6-05; and providing services to its customers involving electronic transfer of funds to the same extent that other financial institutions chartered and regulated by an agency of the federal government are permitted to provide those services within this state. A bank that provides electronic funds transfer equipment and service to its customers, at premises separate from its main banking house or duly authorized facility approved by the state banking board, must make the equipment and service available for use by customers of any other bank upon the request of the other bank to share its use and the agreement of the other bank to share pro rata all costs incurred in connection with its installation and operation, and the electronic operations are not deemed to be the establishment of a branch, nor of a separate facility. The electronic operations at premises separate from its banking house or duly authorized facility must be considered a customer electronic funds transfer center and may be established subject to rules that the state banking board adopts.

Enter into contracts, incur obligations, and generally to perform all acts necessary or appropriate to take advantage of any and all memberships, loans, subscriptions, contracts, grants, rights, or privileges which may be or become available or may inure to banking institutions or to their depositors, creditors, stockholders, conservators, receivers, or liquidators under the provisions of the federal Act creating the federal deposit insurance corporation or under any other Act or regulation of Congress to aid, regulate, or safeguard banking institutions and their depositors, including any amendments thereto or substitution therefor, when authorized so to do by its board of directors.

Subscribe for and acquire any stock, debentures, bonds, or other types of securities of the federal deposit insurance corporation and to comply with the lawful regulations and requirements from time to time issued or made by such corporation.

Take, receive, and hold United States postal savings deposits and to take any action necessary to procure the deposit of the same.

Enter into the business of dealing in securities and stock for the purpose of purchasing and selling such securities and stock without recourse, solely upon the order, and for the account of individual and institutional customers and to provide portfolio investment advisory, management, information, forecasting, and research services to such customers in combination with or separate from such purchases and sales.

Exercise fiduciary powers upon application as provided under section 6-05-01 as the board may prescribe by rule.

Invest all moneys received by it in a trust, in authorized securities, and be responsible to the owner or a third-party beneficiary for the validity, regularity, quality, value, and genuineness of these investments and securities at the time made and for the safekeeping of these securities and the evidences of the securities. When special directions are given in any order, judgment, decree, will, or other written instrument as to the particular manner or the particular class or kind of securities or property in which any investment may be made, a bank shall follow this direction and, in such case, it is not further responsible by reason of the performance of the trust. A bank may retain and continue any investment and security or securities coming into its possession in any fiduciary capacity. For the faithful discharge of its duties and the discharge of its trust, it is entitled to reasonable compensation or an amount as has been or may be agreed upon by the parties and all necessary expenses, with legal interest on those amounts. The trustee may acquire and retain securities of any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940 [Pub. L. 76-686; 54 Stat.789; 15U.S.C. 80a-1-80a-52]. The fact that the banking institution, or an affiliate of the banking institution, is providing services to the investment company or trust as investment advisor, sponsor, broker, distributor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, or otherwise and receiving compensation for the services does not preclude the trustee from investing in the securities of that investment company or trust. The banking institution and trust shall disclose to all current income beneficiaries of the trust the rate, formula, and method of the compensation, and the relationship of ownership. No compensation or commission paid or agreed to be paid to it for the negotiation of a loan or the execution of a trust may be deemed interest within the meaning of the law, nor may any excess thereof over the legal rate be deemed usury.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 4; 1893, ch. 27, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 3229; S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 3229; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 5; R.C. 1905, § 4639; S.L. 1913, ch. 51, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 5150; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 13, subss. a, b, c, d, e, f; 1935, ch. 95, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 6-0302; S.L. 1969, ch. 102, § 1; 1975, ch. 68, § 1; 1981, ch. 107, § 1; 1987, ch. 104, § 1; 1993, ch. 67, § 2; 1995, ch. 79, § 7; 1995, ch. 82, § 1; 1995, ch. 83, § 1; 1997, ch. 78, § 4; 1997, ch. 79, § 4; 1999, ch. 81, § 1; 2007, ch. 82, § 1; 2009, ch. 95, §
1; 2011, ch. 76, § 2; 2017, ch. 73, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Credit union, powers, see § 6-06-06.

Records of business transactions and corporate meetings required, see § 10-19.1-84.

6-03-02.1.
Indemnification by banking association.

Each banking association has the same power to indemnify as provided for business corporations in section 10-19.1-91.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 68, § 1; 1989, ch. 100, § 1.

6-03-02.2.
Issuance of certificates of deposit — Penalty.

Certificates of deposit, as defined in section 41-03-04, may only be issued in this state by financial institutions authorized to issue certificates of deposit and chartered to do business in this state under this chapter or as authorized under section 6-06-06.1. Any person violating this section is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 119, § 1; 1991, ch. 82, § 2; 2007, ch. 78, § 2.

6-03-02.3.
Parity for state and national banks.

Subject to authorization by the state banking board, acting by order or rule, a state bank has the same powers as a national bank and may engage directly or indirectly in any activity in which a bank could engage if the state bank were nationally chartered.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 77, § 2.

6-03-03.
Directors — Qualifying shares — Issue and transfer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 116, § 2.

6-03-04.
Director’s oath of office — Filing.

Every director, when elected or appointed, shall take an oath that the director shall, so far as the duty devolves upon a director, diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the association and will not knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated any of the provisions of this title. Such oath, subscribed by the director making it and certified by the officer before whom it was taken, at once must be transmitted to the commissioner to be filed in the commissioner’s office.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 14; 1893, ch. 27, § 14; R.C. 1895, § 3239; R.C. 1899, § 3239; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 15; R.C. 1905, § 4649; C.L. 1913, § 5164; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 26; R.C. 1943, § 6-0304; S.L. 1969, ch. 103, § 1; 1985, ch. 116, § 1.

6-03-04.1.
Standard of conduct for directors of financial institutions.

A director shall discharge the duties of the position of director in good faith, in a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the financial institution, and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances. A person who so performs those duties is not liable by reason of being or having been a director of the financial institution.

A director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the financial institution whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board upon which the director does not serve, duly established by the board as to matters within its designated authority, if the director reasonably believes the committee to merit confidence.

Subsection 2 does not apply to a director who has specialized knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes the reliance otherwise permitted by subsection 2 unwarranted.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board when an action is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present is presumed to have assented to the action approved, unless the director:

Objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate thereafter in the meeting, in which case the director shall not be considered to be present at the meeting for any purpose;

Votes against the action at the meeting; or

Is prohibited from voting on the action:

By the articles;

By the bylaws;

As the result of a decision to approve, ratify, or authorize a transaction that meets the standards and follows the process stated in section 10-19.1-51 for a business corporation; or

By a conflict of interest policy adopted by the board.

A director’s personal liability to the financial institution or its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director may be eliminated or limited in the articles. The articles may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any breach of the director’s duty of loyalty to the financial institution or its shareholders;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

For illegal distributions which a director who is present and not disqualified from acting has voted for or failed to vote against;

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit; or

For any act or omission occurring prior to the date when the provision in the articles eliminating or limiting liability becomes effective.

In discharging the duties of the position of director, a director may, in considering the best interests of the financial institution, consider the interests of the financial institution’s employees, customers, suppliers, and creditors; the economy of the state and nation; community and societal considerations; and the long-term and short-term interests of the financial institution and its shareholders, including the possibility these interests may be best served by the continued independence of the financial institution.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 78, § 1.

6-03-05.
Loans on real estate — Regulation — Limitation.

Before any real estate loan equal to or more than four hundred thousand dollars is made, an appraisal must be conducted by a licensed or certified appraiser if required by the federal Financial Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 [Pub. L. 101-73; 103 Stat. 512; 12 U.S.C. 3332 et seq.].

Before any real estate loan that does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 is made, a bank must obtain an appropriate evaluation of real property collateral for transactions if an appraisal by a licensed or certified appraiser is not obtained.

Regardless of the value of a real estate loan, the commissioner may issue an order requiring an appraisal by a licensed or certified appraiser when necessary to address safety and soundness concerns. Any real estate loan made must conform to loan-to-value limits as established by rule by the state banking board under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 1, subs. 8; R.C. 1899, § 3229, subs. 8; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 5, subs. 8; R.C. 1905, § 4639, subs. 8; S.L. 1913, ch. 51, § 1, subs. 8; C.L. 1913, § 5150, subs. 8; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 13, subs. h; R.C. 1943, § 6-0305; S.L. 1959, ch. 103, § 1; 1963, ch. 95, § 1; 1965, ch. 86, § 1; 1971, ch. 103, § 1; 1973, ch. 65, § 1; 1977, ch. 69, § 1; 1985, ch. 117, § 1; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; 1993, ch. 70, § 1; 1995, ch. 84, § 1; 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 2005, ch. 82, § 1; 2013, ch. 77, § 13; 2021, ch. 76, § 5, effective April 13, 2021.

6-03-05.1.
Additional optional loans and advances. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 84, § 1.

6-03-05.2.
Agricultural loan amortization and deferral. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 1989, ch. 99, § 3.

6-03-06.
Sale of real estate loans.

In selling or disposing of loans made upon real estate security, no association has power to guaranty the payment or collection thereof except as necessary to sell residential mortgage loans on the secondary market, and any such guaranty made in violation of this provision is not binding on the association but is upon the officer or other person making the same.

Source:

S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 1, subs. 8; R.C. 1899, § 3229, subs. 8; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 5, subs. 8; R.C. 1905, § 4639, subs. 8; S.L. 1913, ch. 51, § 1, subs. 8; C.L. 1913, § 5150, subs. 8; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 13, subs. h; R.C. 1943, § 6-0306; 2009, ch. 96, § 1.

6-03-07.
Investment in banking facility, furniture, and fixtures — Limitation.

A state banking association may not invest more than sixty-five percent of the amount of its unimpaired capital stock, surplus, and undivided profits in a banking facility, furniture, fixtures, and equipment without the approval of the commissioner or the state banking board.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 5; 1893, ch. 27, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 3230, subs. 1; S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1899, § 3230, subs. 1; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 6, subs. 1; R.C. 1905, § 4640, subs. 1; S.L. 1911, ch. 54, § 1; 1913, ch. 52, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 5151; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 14; 1933, ch. 73, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0307; S.L. 1955, ch. 99; 1957 Supp., § 6-0307; S.L. 1965, ch. 85, § 3; 1985, ch. 118, § 1; 1993, ch. 71, § 1; 1997, ch. 78, § 5; 1999, ch. 73, § 1.

Cross-References.

Purchase of municipal revenue bonds by state or national banks in amounts not to exceed ten percent of their capital and surplus, see § 40-57-10.

6-03-08.
Powers as to other real estate.

Every state banking association has the power to purchase, hold, and convey other real estate as herein provided, and not otherwise:

Such as is mortgaged to it in good faith by way of security for loans or for debts previously contracted.

Such as is conveyed to it in good faith in satisfaction of debts previously contracted in the course of its dealings.

Such as it purchases at sales under judgments, decrees, or mortgages held by the association or purchases to secure debts due to it.

Upon transfer to other real estate owned, a current appraisal must be conducted by an individual who is independent of the transaction. Notwithstanding other sections of this chapter, a bank may apply to the commissioner for authority to exchange its interest in real property acquired in satisfaction of a debt previously contracted for an interest in an entity that would dispose of the real property. If the commissioner’s decision with respect to an application is unfavorable, the applicant bank may appeal the decision to the state banking board by filing a notice of appeal with the commissioner within twenty business days after the commissioner has notified the applicant bank of the decision.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 5; 1893, ch. 27, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 3230; S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 3230; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 4640; S.L. 1911, ch. 54, § 2; 1913, ch. 52, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 5152; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 6-0308; 1991, ch. 83, § 2; 1993, ch. 70, § 2; 2011, ch. 76, § 3.

6-03-09.
Holding of real estate — Limitation.

No banking association may hold the possession of any real estate under mortgage, nor title and possession of any real estate purchased to satisfy indebtedness, for a longer period than five years from the date of acquiring title thereto unless such time has been extended by certificate of the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 5; 1893, ch. 27, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 3230, subs. 4; S.L. 1899, ch. 28, § 2, subs. 4; R.C. 1899, § 3230, subs. 4; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 6, subs. 4; R.C. 1905, § 4640, subs. 4; S.L. 1911, ch. 54, § 2; 1913, ch. 52, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 5152; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 15, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0309.

6-03-10.
Violation of powers — Penalty.

Any banking association violating the provisions of the preceding sections of this chapter relating to powers, at the discretion of the state banking board, shall forfeit its charter. Any officer, director, or employee who knowingly violates or permits the violation of any of such provisions is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 54, § 3; 1913, ch. 52, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 5153; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 6-0310; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 41.

6-03-11.
Conversion, consolidation, or merger.

Any two or more banking institutions upon making application to the commissioner or the state banking board may consolidate or merge if authorized by the commissioner or board into one banking institution under the charter of either existing banking institution on such terms and conditions as lawfully may be agreed upon by a majority of the board of directors of each banking institution proposing to consolidate or merge subject to rules adopted by the state banking board. Before becoming final, such consolidation or merger must be ratified and confirmed by the vote of the shareholders of each such banking institution owning at least two-thirds of its capital stock outstanding at a meeting to be held on the call of the directors. Notice of such meeting and of the purpose thereof must be given to each shareholder of record by registered or certified mail at least ten days prior to the meeting. The shareholders may unanimously waive such notice and may consent to such meeting and consolidation or merger in writing. The capital stock and surplus of such consolidated banking institution must not be less than that required under this title for the organization of a banking institution of the class of the largest consolidating banking institution. Immediately after the consolidation or merger a full report thereof, including a statement of the assets and liabilities of the consolidated banking institution, must be made to the commissioner by the surviving banking institution. Any banking institution may without approval by any state authority convert into or merge or consolidate with a national banking association as provided by federal law. A national bank proposing to merge into a state-chartered bank shall grant the commissioner discretionary authority to conduct an examination. The commissioner shall set fees for such examination at an hourly rate sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department of financial institutions associated with the examination. Fees must be collected by the commissioner and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 138; 1925 Supp., §§ 5191c1 to 5191c23; S.L. 1927, ch. 93, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 52; R.C. 1943, § 6-0311; S.L. 1949, ch. 104, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 6-0311; S.L. 1965, ch. 84, § 2; 1991, ch. 85, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 12; 2013, ch. 77, § 14; 2021, ch. 76, § 6, effective April 13, 2021.

Collateral References.

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of consolidation or merger, 48 A.L.R.3d 430.

Construction and application of 12 USCS §§ 2:4-214(c) authorizing conversion of national bank into, or its merger or consolidation with state bank, 15 A.L.R. Fed. 817.

6-03-12.
Transfer of assets on consolidation or merger.

All of the rights, property, franchises, and interests of the consolidating or merging bank or trust company are deemed to be transferred to and vested in the bank or trust company into which it is consolidated or merged without other instrument of transfer. The consolidated bank or trust company shall hold and enjoy the same and all rights, property, franchises, and interests in the same manner and to the same extent as were held and enjoyed by the bank or trust company so consolidated or merged therewith, including the holding and performing by any bank or trust company of any and all trust and fiduciary relations whatsoever as to and for which either or any of the banks or trust companies so consolidating or merging may have been appointed, nominated, or designated by any will, agreement, conveyance, or otherwise, whether or not such trust or fiduciary relationship has come into being or has taken effect at the time of the consolidation or transfer. The merging bank or trust company, however, shall transfer all of its real property to the consolidated bank or trust company by good and sufficient deed of conveyance, and for that and other purposes, it remains a body corporate until dissolved in the manner provided in chapter 6-07.2, or if no assets or liabilities remain, until the certificate is canceled by the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 138; 1925 Supp., §§ 5191c1 to 5191c23; S.L. 1927, ch. 93, § 1; 1931, ch. 95, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 52; R.C. 1943, § 6-0312; S.L. 1991, ch. 81, § 3; 2021, ch. 77, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

6-03-13.
Conversion to national bank — Sale of bank — Removal to new location.

An association organized to do business in any city in this state, and which has sold or converted its business to a national bank or to any other banking association which is continued at the same place, may not use its charter to recommence business at another place without first obtaining the consent of the state banking board. When a banking association which has not so converted or sold its business is located at a place where there is not, or can reasonably project that there will not be, sufficient business for the profitable conduct of a bank, such association may apply to the state banking board for authority to remove its business to some other place within the state and to change its name if desired, and upon the approval of such application, by the board and the proper amendment of the articles of incorporation, the board may issue authority for such removal and change. No such association, however, is permitted to remove its business to any city unless it has the full amount of capital stock and surplus required by this title for a new organization in such city. A banking association may apply to the state banking board for authority to move its main office to any location currently being operated by the banking association as a facility or to another location within the same corporate city limits.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 7; R.C. 1905, § 4641; S.L. 1911, ch. 55, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 5155; S.L. 1915, ch. 56, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5155; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 17; 1935, ch. 93, § 1; 1943, ch. 88, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 6-0313; S.L. 1969, ch. 104, § 1; 2011, ch. 76, § 4; 2013, ch. 77, § 15.

6-03-13.1.
Separate facilities authorized.

Upon compliance with section 6-03-13.3, any bank organized under chapter 6-02 and under the supervision of the state banking board, and any national bank doing business in this state, may maintain and operate separate and apart from its banking house facilities, in addition to such service at its main banking house. Any activity incidental to the business of banking may be transacted at a separate facility, including receiving deposits of every kind and nature, cashing checks or orders to pay, issuing exchange, making loans, renting safe deposit boxes, exercising fiduciary powers if authorized by the board, and receiving payments payable at the bank. Whenever any banking institution that has been granted approval to establish and maintain a facility deems it advisable to discontinue the maintenance of the facility, the banking institution may apply to the commissioner or state banking board for cancellation and the commissioner or board may order the cancellation approval within the time the board specifies. The banking institution shall provide notice of the application as required by the board by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 96, § 1; 1973, ch. 66, § 1; 1981, ch. 105, § 2; 1981, ch. 109, § 1; 1991, ch. 86, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, § 2; 1995, ch. 79, § 9; 2009, ch. 97, § 1.

6-03-13.2.
Further limitations upon facility. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 86, § 4.

6-03-13.3.
Facts considered for approval.

Whenever any bank desires to maintain and operate a facility separate and apart from its banking house, pursuant to section 6-03-13.1, or to move a facility previously established to another location, it shall apply to the commissioner or the comptroller of the currency, as the case may be, for such authority and provide the commissioner with such relevant information as the commissioner may reasonably request. In determining whether to approve the application for such facility, the commissioner shall take into consideration:

The convenience, needs, and welfare of the people of the community and area served; and

The financial strength of the bank in relation to the cost of establishing and maintaining such separate facility.

Upon approval by the commissioner or state banking board of a merger application under section 6-03-11, the former main office and facilities of the banking institutions being merged will become facilities of the surviving banking institution and the banking institution is not required to file an application under this section.

If the commissioner’s decision with respect to an application is unfavorable, the applicant bank may appeal the decision to the state banking board by filing a notice of appeal with the commissioner within twenty days after the commissioner has notified the applicant bank of the decision.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 96, § 1; 1973, ch. 66, § 3; 1991, ch. 86, § 2; 2001, ch. 90, § 1; 2005, ch. 83, § 1; 2021, ch. 76, § 7, effective April 13, 2021.

6-03-13.4.
Effect of authority.

Every paying and receiving station, banking house or office, or drive-in and walkup facility existing on August 1, 1996, must be considered a separate facility approved by the state banking board or the comptroller of the currency, as the case may be, under this chapter. A facility approved under this section may continue to provide from the facility those services or functions as were permitted to be provided before August 1, 1996. National banking associations located in this state have the same, but no greater, right by virtue of sections 6-03-13.1 and 6-03-13.3 as banks organized under the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 96, § 4; 1991, ch. 86, § 3; 1995, ch. 79, § 10.

6-03-13.5.
National bank, federal savings association, or state savings and loan association conversion to state bank.

A national bank, federal savings association, or state savings and loan association located in this state which follows the procedure prescribed by federal law to convert into a state bank must be granted a state charter if it meets the provisions of the North Dakota Century Code for the incorporation and chartering of a new state bank. Any requirement that shares must be paid in cash may be satisfied by the exchange of shares of the converted state bank for those of the converting national bank, federal savings association, or state savings and loan association, which may be valued at no more than their fair cash market value. The procedure for incorporation of a state bank may be modified by the board to the extent made necessary by the difference between an ordinary incorporation and a conversion and no public hearing need be held on a conversion application. A national bank, federal savings association, or state savings and loan association proposing to convert into a state-chartered bank shall grant the commissioner discretionary authority to conduct an examination. The commissioner shall set fees for the examination at an hourly rate sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department of financial institutions associated with the examination. Fees must be collected by the commissioner, transferred to the state treasurer, and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 104, § 1; 1981, ch. 110, § 1; 1991, ch. 85, § 2; 1997, ch. 99, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 13.

6-03-13.6.
Branch conversions.

Notwithstanding section 6-03-13.1, any bank organized under chapter 6-02, any national bank doing business in this state, or any bank established in this state by any bank holding company doing business in this state as of January 1, 1995, may convert a branch of a federal savings and loan association located in this state which was in existence as of March 1, 1995, purchased by the bank between January 1, 1995, and August 1, 1996, into a facility of the bank to be maintained at the same branch location if the acquisition and conversion does not violate the deposit limitations provisions contained in sections 6-08-30 and 6-08.3-03.1 and the acquisition and conversion of the branch is approved by the appropriate regulatory agencies.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 11; 2003, ch. 48, § 2; 2003, ch. 71, § 1.

6-03-14.
Paying and receiving stations authorized. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-14.1.
Maintenance of facilities of merged banks. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-14.2.
Subsidiary depository institutions as agents.

Any bank subsidiary of a bank holding company may receive deposits, renew time deposits, close loans, service loans, and receive payments on loans and any other obligations as an agent for a depository institution affiliate, subject to any requirements established by the board by rule. Notwithstanding any other law, a bank acting as an agent under this section may not be considered to be a branch of the affiliate. However, a depository institution may not conduct any activity as an agent that it is prohibited from conducting as a principal under any federal or state law.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 8.

6-03-15.
Application to state banking board to establish stations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-15.1.
Temporary relocation of bank operations.

In the event of an emergency or other temporary relocation, a bank shall notify the commissioner to relocate its main banking house or facility until the former location is repaired to allow bank operations to resume. No notice or public hearing need be held to act upon the temporary relocation request. The bank shall give the commissioner notice of the bank’s decision to relocate promptly and in any case within three days in the event of an emergency, and at least thirty days prior for other temporary relocations. The notice must describe the bank’s actions and the expected duration of the bank’s relocation. Unless extended by the commissioner, a bank’s authority to change the bank’s location under this section may not exceed sixty days. Notice of the bank’s intention to temporarily relocate must be provided to customers at least ten days before the relocation.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 85, § 1; 1997, ch. 79, § 5; 2021, ch. 76, § 8, effective April 13, 2021.

6-03-15.2.
Operations during epidemic or emergency — Notice to commissioner.

A bank that operates physical facilities in any area that is experiencing an epidemic or other emergency may adjust the bank’s operations in any manner that is reasonable to protect the bank’s customers, employees, assets, or business. Under this section a bank may temporarily close or relocate offices, employees, or operations; restrict access to offices or services; and change the manner in which the bank provides banking services. A bank shall notify the commissioner of any actions the bank takes under the authority of this section. The bank shall give the commissioner notice promptly and in any case within three business days of the bank’s decision to adjust the bank’s operations. The notice must describe the bank’s actions and the expected duration of the bank’s adjusted operations. Unless extended by the commissioner, a bank’s authority to change the bank’s operations under this section may not exceed sixty days.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 83, § 1.

6-03-16.
Investigation and procedure on application to establish station. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-17.
Transaction of business at and regulation of station. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-18.
When station must be discontinued — Revocation of permit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-19.
Cancellation of station permit on application to board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 79, § 24.

6-03-20.
Impairment of capital — Notice to commissioner — Penalty.

The president, cashier, or other officer in active charge of any state banking association shall notify the commissioner immediately by certified mail of any impairment of capital or reduction of capital stock thereof, and any such officer failing so to do is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 6-0320; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 42.

6-03-21.
Impairment of capital — Dividends stopped — Action by board — Restoration.

Whenever the capital of any state banking association becomes impaired or the capital stock reduced below the amount required by this title or by the articles of incorporation, no dividend may be declared nor distribution of profits made thereafter while any debts of the association remain unsatisfied, nor until the impairment or deficiency is made good. Whenever it appears that the capital of any state banking association has become impaired or its capital stock reduced, the commissioner shall report the same to the state banking board immediately. The commissioner thereupon shall issue and enforce the necessary order restraining the declaring of dividends and requiring that the impairment or deficiency be made good. The impairment or deficiency must be made good within sixty days thereafter, or the commissioner, upon the order or direction of the state banking board, may take charge of the state banking association and proceed to liquidate the association as in case of insolvency.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 37; R.C. 1905, § 4671; C.L. 1913, § 5186; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 18; R.C. 1943, § 6-0321; 1997, ch. 78, § 6.

6-03-22.
Impairment of capital — Stock assessments — Notice and limitation.

When the capital of any association becomes impaired or when its capital stock is reduced below the amount required by this title or its articles of incorporation, the board of directors of the association has the power, and it is its duty, immediately to make a pro rata assessment upon all the outstanding stock of the association to make good such impairment or deficiency, and to serve notice thereof by registered or certified mail upon each stockholder of record, directed to such stockholder at the stockholder’s address last known to the board. Any such assessment or assessments may not exceed in the aggregate one hundred percent of the face value of the stock in the first year and may not exceed twenty-five percent in any succeeding year. The notice must specify the date on which the assessment is due and payable, and such date may not be less than ten days nor more than thirty days after the date of mailing the notice of assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 18; R.C. 1943, § 6-0322.